Mississippi, session 2026, HB1612.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 45-1-2, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-1-2.  (1)  The Executive Director of the Department of Public Safety shall be the Commissioner of Public Safety. (2)  The Commissioner of Public Safety shall establish the organizational structure of the Department of Public Safety, which shall include the creation of any units necessary to implement the duties assigned to the department and consistent with specific requirements of law including, but not limited to, the: (a)  Office of Public Safety Planning; (b)  Office of Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol; (c) * * *  Office of Mississippi State Bureau of Investigation * * * (to be directed by a Lieutenant Colonel of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol); which shall include: (i)  The Mississippi Bureau of Investigations; (ii)  The Bureau of Narcotics; (iii)  The Bureau of Homeland Security which may be referred to as the Office of Homeland Security; (iv)  The Bureau of Forensic Laboratories, which may be referred to as the Office of Forensic Laboratories and shall include the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory and the State Medical Examiner; * * *  (d)  Office of Forensic Laboratories, which includes the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory and the Office of the State Medical Examiner; ( * * *ed)  Office of Law Enforcement Officers' Training Academy; ( * * *fe)  Office of Support Services; * * *  (g)  Office of Narcotics, which shall be known as the Bureau of Narcotics; (h) Office of Homeland Security; ( * * *if)  Office of Capitol Police; ( * * *jg)  Office of Driver Service Bureau; and ( * * *kh)  Office of Commercial Transportation Enforcement Division. (3)  The department shall be headed by a commissioner, who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Governor.  The appointment of the commissioner shall be made with the advice and consent of the Senate.  The commissioner shall have, at a minimum, a bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university. (4)  Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the commissioner shall appoint heads of offices, who shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner.  The commissioner shall have the authority to organize the offices established by subsection (2) of this section as deemed appropriate to carry out the responsibilities of the department.  The commissioner may assign to the appropriate offices such powers and duties as deemed appropriate to carry out the department's lawful functions.  The organization charts of the department shall be presented annually with the budget request of the Governor for review by the Legislature. (5)  The commissioner shall appoint, from within the Department of Public Safety, a statewide safety training officer who shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner and whose duty it shall be to perform public training for both law enforcement and private persons throughout the state concerning proper emergency response to the mentally ill, terroristic threats or acts, domestic conflict, other conflict resolution, and such other matters as the commissioner may direct. (6)  The commissioner, after consultation with the Mississippi Association of Chiefs of Police and the Mississippi Sheriffs' Association, shall be responsible for establishing guidelines for response to active shooter situations and any related jurisdictional issues. (7)  The commissioner shall establish within the department the Mississippi Office of Homeland Security for the purpose of seeing that the laws are faithfully executed and for the purpose of investigating cyber-related crimes and suppressing crimes of violence and acts of intimidation and terror.  The commissioner is hereby authorized to employ within the Office of Homeland Security a director, investigators and other qualified personnel as he may deem necessary to make investigation of cyber-related crimes, crimes of violence and acts of terrorism or intimidation, to aid in the arrest and prosecution of persons charged with such cyber-related crimes, crimes of violence, acts of terrorism or intimidation, or threats of violence and to perform other duties as necessary to accomplish these purposes.  Investigators and other law enforcement personnel employed by the commissioner shall have full power to investigate, apprehend, and arrest persons committing cyber-related crimes, acts of violence, intimidation, or terrorism anywhere in the state, and shall be vested with the power of police officers in the performance of such duties as provided herein.  Such investigators and other personnel shall perform their duties under the direction of the commissioner, or his designee.  The commissioner shall be authorized to offer and pay suitable rewards to other persons for aiding in such investigation and in the apprehension and conviction of persons charged with cyber-related crimes, acts of violence, or threats of violence, or intimidation, or acts of terrorism. (8)  The commissioner shall establish within the Office of Homeland Security a Mississippi Analysis and Information Center (MSAIC Fusion Center) which shall be the highest priority for the allocation of available federal resources for statewide information sharing, including the deployment of personnel and connectivity with federal data systems.  Subject to appropriation therefor, the Mississippi Fusion Center shall employ three (3) regional analysts dedicated to analyzing and resolving potential threats identified by the agency's statewide social media intelligence platform and the dissemination of school safety information. SECTION 2.  Section 19-5-371, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 19-5-371.  Sections 19-5-303, 19-5-313, 19-5-319, 19-5-331, 19-5-333, 19-5-335, 19-5-337, 19-5-339, 19-5-341, 19-5-353, * * * 19‑5‑357, 19-5-359 and 19-5-361 shall stand repealed from and after July 1, 2028. SECTION 3.  Section 41-61-75, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: [From and after January 1, 2024, and through December 31, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 41-61-75.  (1)  For each investigation with the preparation and submission of the required reports, the following fees shall be billed to and paid by the county for which the service is provided: (a) A medical examiner or his deputy shall receive One Hundred Eighty-five Dollars ($185.00) for each completed report of investigation of death, plus the examiner's actual expenses.  In addition to that fee, in cases where the cause of death was sudden infant death syndrome (SIDS) and the medical examiner provides a SIDS Death Scene Investigation report, the medical examiner shall receive for completing that report an additional Fifty Dollars ($50.00), or an additional One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) if the medical examiner has received advanced training in child death investigations and presents to the county a certificate of completion of that advanced training.  The State Medical Examiner shall develop and prescribe a uniform format and list of matters to be contained in SIDS/Child Death Scene Investigation reports, which shall be used by all county medical examiners and county medical examiner investigators in the state. (b)  The pathologist performing autopsies as provided in Section 41-61-65 shall receive * * * One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) One Thousand Two Hundred Dollars ($1,200.00) per completed autopsy, plus mileage expenses to and from the site of the autopsy, and shall be reimbursed for any out-of-pocket expenses for third-party testing, not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) per autopsy. (2)  (a)  When a medical examiner, physician or pathologist is subpoenaed for appearance and testimony before a grand jury, courtroom trial or deposition as a result of their duties as a State Medical Examiner, physician or pathologist, the office with which the subpoenaed professional is employed shall be entitled to bill an expert witness hourly fee and mileage expenses to and from the site of the testimony, and such amount shall be paid by the jurisdiction or party issuing the subpoena. (b)  The expert witness fee shall be set by the director, and the expert fee shall be a reasonable fee considering the prevailing rates of other comparably respected available experts.  The fee under this paragraph (b) shall be made payable to the Office of the State Medical Examiner. [From and after January 1, 2028, this section shall read as follows:] 41-61-75.  (1)  For each investigation with the preparation and submission of the required reports, the following fees shall be billed to and paid by the county for which the service is provided: (a) A medical examiner or his deputy shall receive One Hundred Ninety-five Dollars ($195.00) for each completed report of investigation of death, plus the examiner's actual expenses.  In addition to that fee, in cases where the cause of death was sudden infant death syndrome (SIDS) and the medical examiner provides a SIDS Death Scene Investigation report, the medical examiner shall receive for completing that report an additional Fifty Dollars ($50.00), or an additional One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) if the medical examiner has received advanced training in child death investigations and presents to the county a certificate of completion of that advanced training.  The State Medical Examiner shall develop and prescribe a uniform format and list of matters to be contained in SIDS/Child Death Scene Investigation reports, which shall be used by all county medical examiners and county medical examiner investigators in the state. (b)  The pathologist performing autopsies as provided in Section 41-61-65 shall receive * * * One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) One Thousand Two Hundred Dollars ($1,200.00) per completed autopsy, plus mileage expenses to and from the site of the autopsy, and shall be reimbursed for any out-of-pocket expenses for third-party testing, not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) per autopsy. (2)  (a)  When a medical examiner, physician or pathologist is subpoenaed for appearance and testimony before a grand jury, courtroom trial or deposition as a result of their duties as a State Medical Examiner, physician or pathologist, the office with which the subpoenaed professional is employed shall be entitled to bill an expert witness hourly fee and mileage expenses to and from the site of the testimony, and such amount shall be paid by the jurisdiction or party issuing the subpoena. (b)  The expert witness fee shall be set by the director, and the expert fee shall be a reasonable fee considering the prevailing rates of other comparably respected available experts.  The fee under this paragraph (b) shall be made payable to the Office of the State Medical Examiner. SECTION 4.  Section 63-21-39, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-21-39.  (1)  (a)  An owner who scraps, dismantles or destroys a vehicle and a person who purchases a vehicle as scrap or to be dismantled or destroyed shall indicate same on the back of the certificate of title and shall immediately cause the certificate of title and any other documents required by the department to be mailed or delivered to the department for cancellation.  A certificate of title of the vehicle shall not again be issued except upon application containing the information the department requires, accompanied by a certificate of inspection in the form and content specified in Section 63-21-15(5) and proof of payment of a fee as provided in subsection (2) of this section.  Before a used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor may purchase or receive a motor vehicle from the owner or authorized agent of the owner of the motor vehicle for the purpose of scrapping, dismantling or destroying the motor vehicle, the used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor must verify under Section 63-21-18 the absence of any lien on the motor vehicle.  If a lien exists on the motor vehicle, the used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor may not purchase or receive the motor vehicle for the purpose of scrapping, dismantling or destroying the vehicle, and may not purchase or receive the motor vehicle for such purposes during any time for which a lien exists on the motor vehicle. (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, if the owner or authorized agent of the owner has not obtained a title in his or her name for the vehicle to be transferred, has lost the title for the vehicle to be transferred, or has returned the title to the department in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection, he or she may sign a statement swearing that, in addition to the foregoing conditions, the vehicle is at least ten (10) model years old.  The statement described in this paragraph may be used only to transfer such a vehicle to a licensed used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor.  The department shall promulgate a form for the statement which shall include, but not be limited to: (i) A statement that the vehicle shall never be titled again; it must be dismantled or scrapped; (ii) A description of the vehicle including the year, make, model and vehicle identification number; (iii) The name, address, and driver's license number, nondriver identification card number or tribal identification card number of the owner; (iv) A certification that the owner: 1. Never obtained a title to the vehicle in his or her name; or 2. Was issued a title for the vehicle, but the title was lost or stolen; (v) A certification that the vehicle: 1. Is at least ten (10) model years old; and 2. Is not subject to any security interest or lien; (vi) An acknowledgment that the owner and buyer of the vehicle realizes this form will be filed with the department and that: 1. It is a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both, for conviction of a first offense of knowingly falsifying any information on this statement; and 2. It is a felony, punishable by a fine of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or imprisonment for not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years, or both, for conviction of a second or subsequent offense of knowingly falsifying any information on this statement; (vii) The owner's signature and the date of the transaction; (viii) The name and address of the business acquiring the vehicle; (ix) The National Motor Vehicle Title Information System identification number; and (x) The business agent's signature and date along with a printed name and title if the agent is signing on behalf of a corporation. (c) Until such time as the department makes available an Internet-based system, the used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor shall mail or otherwise deliver the statement required under paragraph (b) of this subsection (1) to the department within three (3) business days of the completion of the transaction, requesting that the department cancel the Mississippi certificate of title and registration.   Once the department develops an Internet-based system, the used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor shall utilize such system and within two (2) business days electronically submit the information contained in the statement using that system. (d)  Within two (2) business days of each day's close of business, the used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor who purchases or receives motor vehicles for scrap or for parts shall deliver in a format approved by the department, by electronic means once developed and made available by the department, a list of all such vehicles purchased that day for scrap or for parts.  That list shall contain the following information: (i)  The name, address and contact information for the reporting entity; (ii)  The vehicle identification numbers of such vehicles; (iii)  The dates such vehicles were obtained; (iv)  The names of the individuals or entities from whom the vehicles were obtained, for use by law enforcement personnel and appropriate governmental agencies only; (v)  A statement of whether the vehicles were, or will be, crushed or disposed of, or offered for sale or other purposes; (vi)  A statement of whether the vehicle is intended for export out of the United States; and (vii)  The National Motor Vehicle Title Information System identification number of the business acquiring the vehicle. In addition, the used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor must certify compliance with the requirements of Section 63-21-39(1)(a). (e)  (i)  For purposes of this subsection, the term "motor vehicle" shall not include a vehicle which has been crushed or flattened by mechanical means such that it is no longer the motor vehicle as described by the certificate of title, or such that the vehicle identification number is no longer visible or accessible. (ii)  In cases in which crushed or flattened vehicles are purchased or received, the purchasing or receiving used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor shall verify that the seller has reported the vehicles in accordance with this subsection.  Such verification may be in the form of a certification from the seller or a contract between the seller and the purchasing or receiving used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor attesting to the seller's compliance with the reporting requirements of this subsection.  Such verification must clearly identify the seller by a government issued photograph identification card or employer identification number, and the verification and copy of the identification card or number shall be maintained by the purchasing or receiving used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor for a period of not less than two (2) years. (f)  The information obtained by the department in accordance with paragraph (d) of this subsection (1) shall be reported to the National Motor Vehicle Title Information System, in a format that will satisfy the requirement for reporting this information, in accordance with rules adopted by the United States Department of Justice in 28 CFR 25.56. (g)  Until such time as the department develops and makes available the Internet-based system described in paragraph (d) of this subsection, the used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor who purchases or receives motor vehicles for scrap or for parts shall deliver the information required by paragraph (d) to the National Motor Vehicle Title Information System through any data consolidator approved by such system, within forty-eight (48) hours of the day the vehicle was purchased or acquired by such used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor which shall satisfy the requirements of paragraph (d). (h)  The information obtained by the department in accordance with paragraph (d) of this subsection (1) shall be made available only to law enforcement agencies and for purposes of canceling certificates of title.  The information shall otherwise be considered to be confidential business information of the respective reporting entities. (i)  All records required under the provisions of this subsection shall be maintained for a period of two (2) years by the reporting entity and shall include a scanned or photocopied copy of the seller's or seller's representative's driver's license or state-issued identification card or other valid form of identification. (j)  A person who knowingly and willfully violates this subsection (1), or any person who knowingly and willfully falsifies or assists another person in falsifying the statement or information required under paragraph (b) or (d) of this subsection, or any person who knowingly and willfully sells a vehicle upon which there is an unsatisfied lien or security interest, or who purchases a vehicle without complying with either paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection and who knowingly and willfully destroys or dismantles a vehicle upon which he knows that there is an unsatisfied lien or security interest shall: (i)  Be guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both, for conviction of a first offense; or (ii) Upon conviction of a second or subsequent offense, a felony, punishable by imprisonment for not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years or a fine of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or both. In addition, the court may order each person convicted to pay restitution to any party suffering monetary loss in the amount of such loss.  No part of any sentence imposed by the court shall be suspended unless such restitution has been paid in full. (k)  A person who knowingly and willfully fails to deliver the title as required under paragraph (a) of this subsection, or the statement required under paragraph (b) of this subsection to the department within seventy-two (72) hours of the completion of the transaction, or who, until such time as the department develops and makes available the Internet-based system described in paragraph (d), fails to deliver the information required by paragraph (d) to the National Motor Vehicle Title Information System through any data consolidator approved by such system, within two (2) business days of the day the vehicle was purchased or acquired by such used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor shall be in violation of this section, and subject to a civil penalty of up to One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per violation.  Actions to impose this penalty may be brought by any local or state law enforcement agency, district attorney, or by the Attorney General, in any court of competent jurisdiction.  One-half (1/2) of the monies generated from such civil penalties shall be deposited in a special fund created in the State Treasury for use by the department's Title Bureau, and one-half (1/2) of the monies generated from such civil penalties shall be deposited in the general fund of the municipality if the suit was brought in a municipal court, or in the general fund of the county if the suit was brought in the court of a county. (2)  For the purpose of requesting a branded title on a vehicle with a salvage certificate of title, every owner of a vehicle that has been issued a salvage certificate of title in this state or any other state which has been restored in this state to its operating condition which existed prior to the event which caused the salvage certificate of title to be issued shall make application to the department, accompanied by a certificate of inspection issued by the Department of Public Safety in the form and content specified in Section 63-21-15(5) and the payment of a fee of * * * Seventy‑five Dollars ($75.00) One Hundred Twenty-five Dollars ($125.00) for each motor vehicle for which a certificate of inspection is issued.  In addition, the Department of Public Safety may charge such a person a fee in the amount of * * * Twenty‑five Dollars ($25.00) Fifty Dollars ($50.00) for performing any vehicle identification number verification required by federal law or regulation for the vehicle for which the person is applying for a title.  All such monies shall be collected by the Department of Public Safety and paid to the State Treasurer for deposit in a special fund that is hereby created in the State Treasury to be known as the "Salvage Certificate of Title Fund."  Monies in the special fund may be expended by the Department of Public Safety, upon appropriation by the Legislature.  The department shall establish by regulation the minimum requirements by which a vehicle which has been issued a salvage certificate of title may be issued a branded title. (3)  Before a branded title may be issued for a vehicle for which a salvage certificate of title has been issued, the applicant shall submit, by hand delivery or mail, such documents and information to the Department of Public Safety as the department may require for the purpose of determining if the vehicle complies with the requirements of this section and all applicable regulations promulgated by the Commissioner of Public Safety and the department.  The Department of Public Safety also may require that an applicant bring a vehicle for which application for a branded title is being made to a Highway Patrol facility for a visual inspection whenever the department deems that a visual inspection is necessary or advisable.  Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit inspectors of the Mississippi Highway Patrol from conducting on-site inspections and investigations of motor vehicle rebuilders or motor vehicle repair businesses to determine if such businesses are in compliance with all applicable laws relating to the motor vehicle title laws of this state and regulations promulgated by the Commissioner of Public Safety and the department. SECTION 5.  Section 45-3-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 45-3-21.  (1)  The powers and duties of the Highway Safety Patrol shall be, in addition to all others prescribed by law, as follows: (a)  To enforce all of the traffic laws, rules and regulations of the State of Mississippi upon all highways of the state highway system and the rights-of-way of such highways; provided, however, that if any person commits an offense upon the state highway system and be pursued by a member of the Highway Safety Patrol, such patrol officer may pursue and apprehend such offender upon any of the highways or public roads of this state, or to any other place to which such offender may flee. (b)  To enforce all rules and regulations of the commissioner promulgated pursuant to legal authority. (c)  When so directed by the Governor, to enforce any of the laws of this state upon any of the highways or public roads thereof. (d)  Upon the request of the Department of Revenue, and with the approval of the Governor, to enforce all of the provisions of law with reference to the registration, license and taxation of vehicles using the highways of this state, and relative to the sizes, weights and load limits of such vehicles, and to enforce the provisions of all other laws administered by the Department of Revenue upon any of the highways or public roads of this state; and for such purpose the Highway Safety Patrol shall have the authority to collect and receive all taxes which may be due under any of such laws, and to report and remit same to the Department of Revenue in the manner required by law, or the rules and regulations of the Department of Revenue. (e)  Upon request of the Commercial Transportation Enforcement Division within the Department of Public Safety, and when so instructed by the commissioner, to enforce the Mississippi Motor Carrier Regulatory Law of 1938 and rules and regulations promulgated thereunder. (f)  To arrest without warrant any person or persons committing or attempting to commit any misdemeanor, felony or breach of the peace within their presence or view, and to pursue and so arrest any person committing such an offense to and at any place in the State of Mississippi where he may go or be.  Nothing herein shall be construed as granting the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol general police powers. (g)  To aid and assist any law enforcement officer whose life or safety is in jeopardy.  Additionally, officers of the Highway Safety Patrol may arrest without warrant any fugitive from justice who has escaped or who is using the highways of the state in an attempt to flee.  With the approval of the commissioner or his designee, officers of the Highway Safety Patrol may assist other law enforcement agencies in manhunts for convicted felons who have escaped and/or for alleged felons where there is probable cause to believe that the person being sought committed the felony and a felony had actually been committed. (h)  To cooperate with the State Forest Service by reporting all forest fires. (i)  Upon request of the sheriff or his designee, or board of supervisors of any county or the chief of police or mayor of any municipality, and when so instructed by the commissioner or his designee, to respond to calls for assistance in a law enforcement incident; such request and action shall be noted and clearly reflected on the radio logs of both the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol district substation and that of the requesting agency, entered on the local NCIC terminal, if available, and a request in writing shall follow within forty-eight (48) hours.  Additionally, the time of commencement and termination of the specific law enforcement incident shall be clearly noted on the radio logs of both law enforcement agencies. (2)  The Legislature declares that the primary law enforcement officer in any county in the State of Mississippi is the duly qualified and elected sheriff thereof, but for the purposes of this subsection there is hereby vested in the Department of Public Safety, in addition to the powers hereinabove mentioned and the other provisions of this section under the terms and limitations hereinafter mentioned and for the purpose of insuring domestic tranquility and for the purpose of preventing or suppressing, or both, crimes of violence, acts and conduct calculated to, or which may, provoke or lead to violence and/or incite riots, mobs, mob violence, a breach of the peace, and acts of intimidation or terror, the powers and duties to include the enforcement of all the laws of the State of Mississippi relating to such purposes, to investigate any violation of the laws of the State of Mississippi and to aid in the arrest and prosecution of persons charged with violating the laws of the State of Mississippi which relate to such purposes.  Investigators of the Bureau of Investigation of the Department of Public Safety shall have general police powers to enforce all the laws of the State of Mississippi.  All officers of the Department of Public Safety charged with the enforcement of the laws administered by that agency, for the purposes herein set forth, shall have full power to investigate, prevent, apprehend and arrest law violators anywhere in the state, and shall be vested with the power of general police officers in the performance of their duties.  The officers of the Department of Public Safety are authorized and empowered to carry and use firearms and other weapons deemed necessary in the discharge of their duties as such and are also empowered to serve warrants and subpoenas issued under the authority of the State of Mississippi.  The Governor shall be authorized to offer and pay suitable rewards to persons aiding in the investigation, apprehension and conviction of persons charged with acts of violence, or threats of violence or intimidation or acts of terrorism.  The additional powers herein granted to or vested in the Department of Public Safety or any of its officers or employees by this section, excepting investigating powers, and those powers of investigators who shall have general police power, being the investigators in the Bureau of Investigation of the Department of Public Safety, shall not be exercised by the Department of Public Safety, or any of its officers or employees, except upon authority and direction of the Governor or Acting Governor, by proclamation duly signed, in the following instances, to wit: (a)  When requested by the sheriff or board of supervisors of any county or the mayor of any municipality on the grounds that mob violence, crimes of violence, acts and conduct of terrorism, riots or acts of intimidation, or either, calculated to or which may provoke violence or incite riots, mobs, mob violence, violence, or lead to any breach of the peace, or either, and acts of intimidation or terror are anticipated, and when such acts or conduct in the opinion of the Governor or Acting Governor would provoke violence or any of the foregoing acts or conduct set out in this subsection, and the sheriff or mayor, as the case may be, lacks adequate police force to prevent or suppress the same. (b)  Acting upon evidence submitted to him by the Department of Public Safety, or other investigating agency authorized by the Governor or Acting Governor to make such investigations, because of the failure or refusal of the sheriff of any county or mayor of any municipality to take action or employ such means at his disposal, to prevent or suppress the acts, conduct or offenses provided for in subsection (1) of this section, the Governor or Acting Governor deems it necessary to invoke the powers and authority vested in the Department of Public Safety. (c)  The Governor or Acting Governor is hereby authorized and empowered to issue his proclamation invoking the powers and authority vested by this paragraph, as provided in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, and when the Governor or Acting Governor issues said proclamation in accordance herewith, said proclamation shall become effective upon the signing thereof and shall continue in full force and effect for a period of ninety (90) days, or for a shorter period if otherwise ordered by the Governor or Acting Governor.  At the signing of the proclamation by the Governor or Acting Governor, the Department of Public Safety and its officers and employees shall thereupon be authorized to exercise the additional power and authority vested in them by this paragraph.  The Governor and Acting Governor may issue additional proclamations for periods of ninety (90) days each under the authority of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (2). (3)  All proclamations issued by the Governor or Acting Governor shall be filed in the Office of the Secretary of State on the next succeeding business day. (4)  It is not the intention of this section to vest the wide powers and authority herein provided for, as general powers of the Department of Public Safety, and the same are not hereby so vested, but to limit these general powers to cases and incidents wherein it is deemed necessary to prevent or suppress the offenses and conditions herein mentioned in this and other subsections of this section, and under the terms and conditions hereinabove enumerated, it being the sense of the Legislature that the prime duties of the Department of Public Safety are to patrol the highways of this state and enforce the highway safety laws. (5)  Patrol officers shall have no interest in any costs in the prosecution of any case through any court; nor shall any patrol officer receive any fee as a witness in any court held in this state, whether a state or federal court. (6)  Provided, however, that the general police power vested by virtue of the terms of subsection (2) of this section is solely for the purposes set out in said subsection. SECTION 6.  Section 45-3-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 45-3-19.  The commissioner shall have authority, with the approval of the Governor, to make needful and proper rules and regulations governing the proper discipline of the members of the patrol, of selecting, designing and effecting an appropriate uniform therefor, and prescribing outfits and equipment and supplies necessary and proper to carry out the objects of this chapter.  The commissioner shall provide the same as well as such weapons, vehicles and equipment as shall be necessary and proper and shall be responsible therefor.  The commissioner, with the approval of the Governor, shall, from time to time, establish headquarters and substations, as he shall deem it advisable for the objects and purposes of such an organization and for the enforcement of the laws, rules and regulations hereinabove provided, and to that end he may, with the approval of the Governor acquire the right to use lands and buildings for the accommodation of members of said organization and properties and equipment. SECTION 7.  Section 45-3-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 45-3-9.  (1)  The chief of patrol, directors, inspectors, assistant inspectors, patrol officers and investigators of the department shall be selected after an examination as to physical and mental fitness, knowledge of traffic laws, rules and regulations of this state, the laws of the state pertaining to arrest, and the rules and regulations of the Mississippi Department of Public Safety and Public Service Commission, such examination to be prescribed by the commissioner.  At the time of appointment they shall be citizens of the United States and the State of Mississippi, of good moral character, and shall be not less than twenty-one (21) years of age and shall have a high school diploma or High School Equivalency Diploma. (2)  Sworn agents of the Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics who are employed as enforcement troopers shall retain all compensatory, personal and sick leave accrued pursuant to Sections 25-3-92, 25-3-93 and 25-3-95. SECTION 8.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.